District of Columbia statutes.
8-2003

Examination of horses.

(a)

The owner, operator, or custodian of each horse engaged in the horse-drawn carriage trade shall have the horse examined by a licensed veterinarian at intervals of not more than 12 months.

(b)

The examinations shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1)

The general physical condition of the horse;

(2)

An inspection of the eyes, teeth, legs, hooves, shoes, and cardiovascular system of the horse;

(3)

The stamina and physical ability of the horse to engage in the horse-drawn carriage trade;

(4)

An inspection for a recurrence of prior injuries; and

(5)

An inspection for disease or other deficiencies.

(c)

The examination shall include a certification from the licensed veterinarian that the horse is physically fit to engage in the horse-drawn carriage trade and is free of any disease or internal parasites. The certification shall be entered on the identification card provided for in § 8-2005 [§ 8-2004].

Mar. 7, 1991, D.C. Law 8-224, § 4, 38 DCR 207
Feb. 5, 1994, D.C. Law 10-68, § 16(a), 40 DCR 6311
1981 Ed., § 6-1033.